Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1372
Injunction; authorized.

The department may maintain an action in the name of the State of Nebraska for an injunction against any person for establishing, operating, or maintaining a crematory without first obtaining a license as a crematory authority under the Cremation of Human Remains Act. In charging any defendant in a complaint in such action, it shall be sufficient to charge that such defendant did, upon a certain day and in a certain county, establish, operate, or maintain a crematory without obtaining a license as a crematory authority under the act, without alleging any further or more particular facts concerning the same.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 18.